Missouri, session 2026, HB2096.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 251.034, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 251.034, to read as follows:
251.034. Payments made under sections 251.032 to 251.038 to the various regional
planning commissions shall be distributed on a matching basis of one-half state funds for one-
half of local funds. No local unit shall receive any payment without providing the matching
funds required. The state funds so allocated shall not exceed the sum of [sixty-five] one
hundred thirtythousand dollars for the East-West Gateway Coordinating Council and for the
Mid-America Regional Council. The remaining allocated state funds shall not exceed the
sum of [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars for each of the following regional planning
commissions: South Central Ozark, Ozark Foothills, Green Hills, [Show-Me,] Bootheel,
[Missouri Valley, Ozark Gateway,] Mark Twain, [ABCD,] Southeast Missouri, Boonslick,
Northwest Missouri, Mid-Missouri, Kaysinger Basin, Lake of the Ozarks, Meramec,
Northeast Missouri, Harry S Truman, MO-Kan, Pioneer Trails, and [Lakes Country]
Southwest Missouri. Beginning July 1, 2027, and each year after, the maximum grant
amount for each regional planning commission shall be adjusted with the Consumer
Price Index.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.